Tennessee, session 114, HB0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Department" means the department of health;
(2) "Hospitals" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201(31)(A)
and (B); and
(3) "Birthing centers" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201.
(b) All hospitals and birthing centers that provide labor and delivery services
shall provide a mother and, if possible, the mother's caregiver or at least one (1) of the
mother's family members information about post-birth warning signs, including
symptoms and available resources, prior to discharge following a birth.
(c) The department shall provide the information about post-birth warning signs,
including symptoms and available resources, to all hospitals and birthing centers and
have the information available on the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0572
001302
- 1 -